Washington statutes.
RCW 41.40.280

Department may withhold refunds of contributions.

The department may, in its discretion, withhold payment of all or part of a member's contributions for not more than six months after a member has ceased to be an employee. A member who files a request for a refund and subsequently enters into employment with an employer prior to the refund being made shall not be eligible for a refund. For purposes of this section, a written or oral employment agreement shall be considered entering into employment.

[ 1994 c 177 s 7; 1991 c 35 s 86; 1973 2nd ex.s. c 14 s 2; 1947 c 274 s 29; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 11072-29.]

NOTES:

Findings—1994 c 177: See note following RCW 41.50.125.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.